Vermont, session 2025-2026, H446.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 24 V.S.A. § 3311 is amended to read:
§ 3311. RATES
(a) Such A municipal corporation may establish rates by meter service or
annual rents to be charged and paid at such the times, and in such the manner
as such the municipal corporation shall determine for the supply of water to the
VT LEG #380526 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.446
2025 Page 2 of 5
inhabitants of such the municipal corporation and others. From time to time, it
may alter, modify, increase, or diminish such the rates and extend them to any
description of property or use as such the municipal corporation may deem
proper. Such rates
(b) Rates or rents may be ordered to be paid in advance, and all necessary
orders and provision may be made and enforced by such the municipal
corporation, relating to the supply or stoppage of water, as it may deem
necessary to insure such ensure the advance payments.
(c) A municipal corporation shall set rates based on the actual cost of
supplying water to the ratepayer as determined under a utility basis of
ratemaking. The municipal corporation shall not set a rate that exceeds the
actual cost of supplying water to the inhabitants of the service area.
(d)(1) A ratepayer may appeal any rate set by a municipal corporation
pursuant to this section. Within 90 days after the date that the municipal
corporation has set the rate, the ratepayer may initiate the appeal by petitioning
the Public Utility Commission for review.
(2) The petition for review shall be signed by not less than five percent
of the ratepayers. For any petition to review the rates set for extraterritorial
ratepayers within the service area, under subsection (c) of this section, the
petition shall be signed by not less than five percent of the extraterritorial
ratepayers affected by the rate.
VT LEG #380526 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.446
2025 Page 3 of 5
(e) The Public Utility Commission shall hear any appeal pursuant to this
section de novo and shall affirm or amend the rates after reviewing the actual
cost of supplying water to the aggrieved ratepayers. The Public Utility
Commission may establish the effective date for the rates as the original
effective date that was proposed by the municipal corporation, may order
refunds or authorize a surcharge to recover lost revenues, and may authorize
recovery of reasonable expenses incurred by the prevailing party in the appeal
proceedings.
Sec. 2. 24 V.S.A. § 3616 is amended to read:
§ 3616. RENTS; RATES
* * *
(d)(1) Where Whenever one of the bases of a rent, rate, or charge is the
appraised value and the premises to be appraised are tax exempt, the board
may cause the listers to appraise the property, including State property, for the
purpose of determining the rates, rents, or charges. The right of appeal from
the appraisal shall be the same as provided in 32 V.S.A. chapter 131. The
Commissioner of Finance and Management is authorized to issue warrants for
rates, rents, or charges against State property and transmit to the State
Treasurer who shall draw a voucher in payment of the rates, rents, or charges.
No charge so established and no tax levied under the provisions of section
3615 of this title shall be considered to be a part of any tax authorized to be
VT LEG #380526 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.446
2025 Page 4 of 5
assessed by the legislative body of any municipality for general purposes but
shall be in addition to any such tax so authorized to be assessed.
(2) Whenever one of the bases of a charge is the appraised value of
property, the commissioners shall establish charges based on the actual cost of
sewer disposal as determined under a utility basis of ratemaking. The
municipal corporation shall not establish a charge that exceeds the actual cost
of supplying sewer disposal services to the inhabitants of the service area.
* * *
(g)(1) The owner of any property subject to charge established pursuant to
subdivision (b)(4) of this section may appeal the charge set by the
commissioners. Within 90 days after the date that the commissioners have set
the rate, the property owner may initiate the appeal by petitioning the Public
Utility Commission for review.
(2) The petition for review shall be signed by not less than five percent
of the property owners within the service area that are subject to the charge.
For any petition to review the rates set for extraterritorial ratepayers under
subdivision (c)(3) of this section, the petition shall be signed by not less than
five percent of the extraterritorial ratepayers affected by the rate.
(3) The Public Utility Commission shall hear any appeal brought
pursuant to this subsection de novo and shall affirm or amend the charges after
reviewing the actual cost of supplying sewer disposal services to the aggrieved
VT LEG #380526 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.446
2025 Page 5 of 5
property owners. The Public Utility Commission may establish the effective
date for the charges as the original effective date that was proposed by the
commissioners, may order refunds or authorize a surcharge to recover lost
revenues, and may authorize recovery of reasonable expenses incurred by the
prevailing party in the appeal proceedings.
Sec. 3. TRANSITION; SUPERSEDED RATES AND AUTHORITY
The amendments contained in Sec. 1 and Sec. 2 of this act shall supersede
any conflicting charter provision, municipal ordinance, municipal bylaw,
adopted water supply rate, or adopted sewer disposal charge that takes effect
prior to July 1, 2025.
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380526 v.1